Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 1

General Provisions

65-21-101. Special powers of corporations.

Telegraph and telephone corporations may construct a telegraph or telephone line and erect the necessary fixtures along, or over, or under the line of any public highway, the streets of any village, town, or city, across, or over, or under rivers, or any land belonging to the state, or along, across, or under county roads, and also over the lands of private individuals in pursuance of the general law authorizing the condemnation of the easement of right of way for works of internal improvement as set forth in title 29, chapter 16; provided, that the ordinary use of such public highway, streets, or county road be not thereby obstructed or the navigation of such waters impeded.

Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 8; 1907, ch. 134, § 1; Shan., § 2444; Code 1932, § 4055; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2101.

Cross-References. Assessment of property for tax purposes, title 67, ch. 5, part 13.

Right of way for lines, microwave relay towers, §§ 65-21-201, 65-21-202.

Utility location, title 13, ch. 24, part 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 7; 23 Tenn. Juris., Telecommunications, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Water Rights in Tennessee (Mahlon L. Townsend), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 557 (1960).

65-21-102. Railroad enabled to operate telegraph and telephone.

Any railroad company incorporated by or under the laws of or operating lines of railroad within this state, and operating telegraph and telephone lines in connection therewith, upon filing its assent to this chapter in the office of the secretary of state, shall thereby become clothed with the rights, powers, and duties provided by this chapter for telegraph and telephone companies, so as to enable telegraph or telephone companies to be operated by it.

Acts 1885, ch. 66, § 12; Shan., § 1843; mod. Code 1932, § 3108; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2102.

65-21-103. Local regulation.

Any village or city within which such line may be constructed shall have all reasonable police powers to regulate the construction, maintenance, or operation of the line within its limits, including the right to exact rentals for the use of its streets and to limit the rates to be charged; provided, that such rentals and limitations as to rates are reasonable and imposed upon all telephone and telegraph companies without discrimination. No village, town, or city shall have the right to prevent the company from constructing, maintaining, and operating the line within the village, town, or city, so long as the line is being constructed, maintained, or operated within the village, town, or city, in accordance with the reasonable police regulations.

Acts 1907, ch. 134, § 1; Shan., § 2444a1; Code 1932, § 4056; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2103.

65-21-104. Consolidation of telephone and electric light companies.

It is lawful for telephone and electric light companies to consolidate into one (1) corporation, or partially consolidate or cooperate in such manner as the respective corporations may determine, with the concurrence of the stockholders of each; but the rights and privileges conferred by this section shall be subject to revocation and repeal.

Acts 1883, ch. 232, § 3; Shan., § 2202; mod. Code 1932, § 4059; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2104.

Collateral References.

Merger or consolidation without required permit as affecting validity of contracts. 30 A.L.R. 890, 42 A.L.R. 1226, 118 A.L.R. 646.

65-21-105. Use of poles of other companies.

No telegraph or telephone company, or other such company, shall be permitted to attach its lines to, or otherwise use, the poles of any other telegraph or telephone company without the consent of such company being first had and obtained.

Acts 1885, ch. 135, § 1; Shan., § 1869; Code 1932, § 3135; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2110.

Cross-References. Exclusive rights not permitted, § 65-21-203.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Telecommunications, § 7.

65-21-106. Discrimination in telephone connections prohibited.

Every telephone company doing business within this state, and engaged in a general telephone business, shall supply all applicants for telephone connection and facilities, without discrimination or partiality; provided, that such applicants comply or offer to comply with the reasonable regulations of the company. No such company shall impose any condition or restriction upon any such applicant that is not imposed impartially upon all persons or companies in like situations, nor shall such company discriminate against any individual or company engaged in lawful business by requiring, as condition for furnishing such facilities, that they shall not be used in the business of the applicant or otherwise, under penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day such company continues such discrimination and refuses such facilities after compliance or offer to comply with the reasonable regulations, and time to furnish the same has elapsed, to be recovered by the applicant whose application is so neglected or refused.

Acts 1885, ch. 66, § 11; Shan., § 1842; Code 1932, § 3107; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Telecommunications, § 5, 6.

Law Reviews.

Administrative Law — 1956 Tennessee Survey (James B. Earle), 9 Vand. L. Rev. 913 (1956).

65-21-107. Government messages.

In consideration of the right-of-way over public property pursuant to §§ 65-21-101 and 65-21-201, every telegraph or telephone corporation shall, in the case of war, insurrection, or civil commotion of any kind, and for the arrest of criminals, give immediate dispatch, at the usual rates of charge, to any message connected therewith of any officer of the state or of the United States.

Any officer or agent of a telegraph or telephone company who fails or refuses to carry out the provisions of subsection (a) commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1885, ch. 66, §§ 5, 6; 1907, ch. 134, § 1; Shan., §§ 1835, 1836, 2444a2; Code 1932, §§ 3099, 3100, 4057; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-2112, 65-2113; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111.

Cross-References. Penalties for Class A misdemeanors, § 40-35-111.

65-21-108. Priority of messages — Privacy.

All other messages, including those received from other telegraph or telephone companies, shall be transmitted in order of their delivery, correctly, and without unreasonable delay, and at the usual rates, and shall be kept strictly confidential, subject, however, to disclosure in any legal proceedings; provided, that arrangements may be made with the publishers of newspapers for the transmission of intelligence of general and public interest.

Any officer or agent of a telegraph or telephone company who willfully violates subsection (a) commits a Class A misdemeanor, and the telegraph or telephone company so violating is liable in damages to the party aggrieved.

Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 8; 1885, ch. 66, §§ 7, 8; 1907, ch. 134, § 1; Shan., §§ 1837, 1838, 2445; Code 1932, §§ 3101, 3102, 4058; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-2114, 65-2115; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111.

Compiler's Notes. This section is deemed superseded, insofar as interstate communications are concerned, by federal law. See McCollum v. Western Union Tel. Co., 180 Tenn. 403, 175 S.W.2d 544 (1943).

Cross-References. Penalties for Class A misdemeanors, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Interstate Commerce, § 8; 23 Tenn. Juris., Telecommunications, § 13.

Attorney General Opinions. Access to bank and telephone records for commercial purposes, OAG 98-0160, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 160 (8/24/98).

65-21-109. Discrimination in messages prohibited.

Every telegraph or telephone company doing business in this state must, under a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for each and every refusal so to do, transmit over its wires to localities on its lines, for any individual or corporation or other telegraph or telephone company, such messages, dispatches, or correspondence, as may be tendered to it by, or to be transmitted to, any individual or corporation, or other telegraph or telephone companies, at the price customarily asked and obtained for the transmission of similar messages, dispatches, or correspondence, without discrimination as to charges or promptness.

The penalty herein prescribed shall be recoverable in any court through proper form of law, one half (½) of which shall go to the prosecutor and one half (½) to the state.

Acts 1885, ch. 66, § 10; Shan., § 1841; Code 1932, § 3106; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2116.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Telecommunications, § 5.

65-21-110. Damage to equipment — Impairment of service — Unauthorized connections.

It is unlawful for any person to damage or obstruct any telegraph or telephone poles, wires, fixtures, or other apparatus or appliances, or to impede or impair the service of any telegraph or telephone line; or to connect by wire, or other means, with any such line, so as to hear, or be in a position to hear, messages going over such line or lines, or for the purpose of getting any service over the line or lines, without first procuring the consent of the owner or owners of the line, or the duly authorized agent of same.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1921, ch. 59, §§ 1, 2; Shan. Supp., §§ 1840a4, 1840a5; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3103, 3104; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-2117, 65-2118; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Destruction or interference with utility lines, fixtures or appliances, § 39-14-411.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Wiretapping and Electronic Surveillance Act, §§ 39-13-601-39-13-603; Tit. 40, ch. 6, part 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), § 401.12.

65-21-111. Warrants against offenders.

It is the duty of any judge of the court of general sessions who knows of any offenses under this chapter to forthwith issue a warrant for the arrest of such person, and have such offender brought before the judge for trial.

Acts 1897, ch. 60, § 2; Shan., § 1840a2; Code 1932, § 3105; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2119.

Cross-References. Persons whose compensation is contingent upon issuance or nonissuance are prohibited from issuing a search warrant, an arrest warrant or mittimus, § 40-5-106.

65-21-112. Failure to relinquish telephone line for emergency call.

Any person who fails to relinquish a telephone party line or a public pay telephone after having been requested to do so to permit another to place an emergency call to a fire department or police department, or for medical aid or ambulance service, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

It is a defense to a prosecution under this section that the accused did not know or did not have reason to know of the emergency in question, or that the accused was also using the telephone party line or public pay telephone for such an emergency call.

Any person who requests another to relinquish a telephone party line or a public pay telephone on the pretext that such person must place an emergency call, knowing such pretext to be false, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Every telephone company doing business in this state shall print a statement of the substance of this section in a permanent place in each telephone directory published by it.

Acts 1955, ch. 272, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-2120 — 65-2122; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Annoying, harassing, obscene communications, penalty, § 39-17-308.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Collateral References.

Telephone company's liability for disclosure of number or address of subscriber holding unlisted number. 1 A.L.R.4th 218.

65-21-113. Officer's right to cut, reroute or divert telephone lines in any emergency involving a barricaded person.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the chief law enforcement officer of any county, city or town, or such law enforcement officer's designee, may by written request require a telephone company employee designated by the company to cut, reroute or divert telephone lines in any emergency where a person or persons barricade themselves, or where a hostage or hostages are being held to prevent telephone communication by the holder of such hostage or hostages with any person other than a law enforcement officer or person authorized by such officer. Good faith reliance on an order issued by the chief law enforcement officer of any county, city or town, or such officer's designee, constitutes a defense to any action brought against a telephone company arising out of attempts by the telephone company to comply with such order.

For the purpose of this section, a barricaded person is one who, by obstruction, barrier or otherwise, makes that person inaccessible and who constitutes a threat to the life, safety or property of that person or others.

Acts 1992, ch. 585, § 1.

65-21-114. Toll-free telephone service within counties.

Any telephone call made between two (2) points in the same county in Tennessee shall be classified as toll-free and shall not be billed to any customer.

This section shall apply to all companies or entities providing telephone service in this state as public utilities, including, but not limited to, telephone companies regulated by the Tennessee public utility commission. However, this section does not apply to any telephone company which is prohibited by federal law from providing countywide service in a particular county.

Nothing in this section is intended to modify or repeal the rate-making and telephone regulatory authority of the commission or the right of telephone companies to earn a fair rate of return.

Acts 1995, ch. 183, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 54, 55.

Compiler's Notes. Pursuant to Acts 1995, ch. 305, the Tennessee public service commission, formerly referred to in this section, terminated July 1, 1996. The commission's powers under this section were transferred as of that date to the Tennessee regulatory authority. The reference has been changed to reflect that change.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (b), substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority”; and in (c), substituted “the commission” for “the authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. The statute is constitutional, except if it is applied to a long distance telephone carrier under circumstances where the carrier does not receive reasonable remuneration for the service it is required to provide, OAG 01-115, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 106 (7/20/01).

Constitutionality of T.C.A. § 65-21-114 mandating county-wide calling. OAG 14-32, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 33 (3/18/14).

65-21-115. Funding for the Tennessee relay services/telecommunications devices access program — Legislative intent — Operation.

Funding for the Tennessee relay services/telecommunications devices access program (TRS/TDAP) programs shall be provided by the state emergency communications board. Such funding shall not exceed the total cost of the TRS/TDAP program in 2012 unless approved by the fiscal review committee.

The Tennessee public utility commission may create a reserve for the TRS/TDAP program which shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) in any given year.

It is the legislative intent that the TRS/TDAP program be designed with consideration of fair distribution of equipment that is technologically available and economically feasible to be provided to assist individuals with any disability using the basic telephone network.

The administrative cost of the Tennessee public utility commission to implement this section shall come from the funding described in subsection (a).

The Tennessee public utility commission is authorized to promulgate rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement this section.

Acts 1999, ch. 417, § 1; 2004, ch. 912, § 2; 2014, ch. 795, § 12; 2017, ch. 94, § 56.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 912, § 1 provided that the act be cited as the “Assistive Telecommunications Device Distribution Program Renovation Act.”

Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 1 provides that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “911 Funding Modernization and IP Transition Act of 2014.”

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, rewrote this section which read: “(a) The Tennessee regulatory authority shall develop by rule an assistive telecommunications device distribution program no later than January 1, 2000, to be administered by the authority. Such plan shall require all telecommunications service providers to contribute in the aggregate a total of no more than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) each year to fund the program. The authority shall create a reserve fund for such program which shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) in any given year. The authority shall by rule determine the annual contribution to be made each year by each telecommunications service provider to fund the program, based upon Tennessee telecommunications total revenue.“(b) It is the legislative intent that such program be designed with consideration of fair distribution of equipment that is technologically available and economically feasible to be provided to assist individuals with any disability using the basic telephone network.“(c) A telecommunications service provider with less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) of Tennessee intrastate gross receipts for the calendar year is not required to make a contribution to the assistive telecommunications device distribution program established pursuant to subsection (a).“(d) The administrative cost of the authority to implement this section shall come from the contributions collected as described in subsection (a).“(e) Contributions to this fund are not to be line-itemized on an end-users telephone bill.“(f) In establishing the distribution procedures, the Tennessee regulatory authority, or its designee, shall base its procedures on the former TTY distribution program funded by annual appropriations during 1987 to 1990 with regard to: the application procedure, purchasing of equipment, maintenance and repair, monthly telephone charges, priority of selection, certification of disability, verification of information, confidentiality, eligibility requirements and special considerations.”

The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (b), (d), and (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 15. January 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-21-116. Construction of wireless communications tower.

A cellular or other wireless telecommunications service provider or other person who proceeds to construct a new tower shall submit the following information to the comptroller of the treasury:

The location of the tower site which shall include the county and the municipality, if appropriate, and the parcel identification number used by the local assessor for property tax purposes, and the street address;

Directions to the tower site;

A copy of a document evidencing the interest in the property on which the tower has been approved; and

The name, mailing address and telephone number of the person responsible for the ad valorem property tax on the tower.

Acts 2000, ch. 951, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 951, § 2 provided that this section does not apply to the siting of any tower that has made application for zoning approval before January 1, 2001.

65-21-117. Interference with emergency calls.

An individual commits an offense if the individual knowingly prevents another individual from placing a telephone call to 911 or from requesting assistance in an emergency from a law enforcement agency, medical facility, or other agency or entity the primary purpose of which is to provide for the safety of individuals.

An individual commits an offense if the individual intentionally renders unusable a telephone that would otherwise be used by another individual to place a telephone call to 911 or to request assistance in an emergency from a law enforcement agency, medical facility, or other agency or entity, the primary purpose of which is to provide for the safety of individuals.

An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

In this section, “emergency” means a condition or circumstance in which any individual is or is reasonably believed by the individual making a telephone call to be in fear of imminent assault or in which property is or is reasonably believed by the individual making the telephone call to be in imminent danger of damage or destruction.

Acts 2012, ch. 1003, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.